Utah statutes.
76-8-201.   Official misconduct -- Unauthorized acts or failure of duty.

A public servant is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if, with an intent to benefit himself or another or to harm another, he knowingly commits an unauthorized act which purports to be an act of his office, or knowingly refrains from performing a duty imposed on him by law or clearly inherent in the nature of his office.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

